Louisiana, session 2026, SB468.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:422.1(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§422.1. Unfair sales of motor fuel; impairment of competition; exemptions; records
to support exemptions
* * *
F. Nothing in this Section or any other provision of law that regulates the
price of motor fuel shall limit or be construed to limit the allowable discount or
the value of fuel points or rewards earned by a customer through participation
in a loyalty program, fuel rewards program, or other fuel discount program in
which earned rewards can be exchanged for discounts on motor fuel at the
retailer providing the program or at other fuel retailers, even if fuel sold
pursuant to this Subsection is sold at a price that would otherwise be prohibited
by this Section or any other provision of law regulating the price of motor fuel.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.